Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 2. Placer Claims on Federal Public Domain.

Sec. 27.10.090.
Sections applicable to precious-metal placers only.

AS

27.10.100

—

27.10.140

apply only to placer deposits containing gold, silver, or other precious metals or minerals.

History.

(§ 47-3-85 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d, Mines and Minerals, § 19 et seq.

58 C.J.S., Mines and Minerals, § 41 et seq.

Sec. 27.10.100.
Limits on size of individual placer claims.

The unit of placer locations in the state is 20 acres, and no single or individual placer mining claim may be located in excess of 20 acres nor have a greater length than 1,320 feet. Where a parcel of placer ground lies between and adjoins two or more validly located claims, the restriction as to length does not apply.

History.

(§ 47-3-86 ACLA 1949)

Secs. 27.10.110,
27.10.120.
Limits on size of association claims; location of claims by agent or attorney. [Repealed, § 4 ch 91 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 27.10.130.
Value of labor or improvements required on placer claims.

Upon each placer mining claim located after March 14, 1935, until patent is issued, not less than $100 worth of labor shall be performed or improvements made during each year for each 20 acres or excess fraction contained in the claim.

History.

(§ 47-3-91 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 27.10.140.
Location in violation of AS 27.10.090 — 27.10.140 is void.

A placer mining claim attempted to be located in violation of AS

27.10.090

—

27.10.140

is null and void, and the whole area of it may be located by a qualified locator as if no earlier attempt had been made, and no placer mining claim that contains a greater area or is longer than is fixed by law may be patented.

History.

(§ 47-3-92 ACLA 1949)